Nevada, session 83, AB101.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 442.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
442.260 1. The Division shall adopt and enforce regulations
governing the conditions under and the methods by which abortions
may be performed, the reasonable minimum qualifications of a
person authorized to provide the information required in NRS
442.253, as well as all other aspects pertaining to the performance of
abortions pursuant to NRS 442.250.
2. The Division shall adopt and enforce regulations for a
system for reporting abortions. This system must be designed to
preserve confidentiality of information on the identity of women
upon whom abortions are performed. The Division may require that
the following items be reported for each abortion:
(a) The date of the abortion;
(b) The place of the abortion including the city, county and
state;
(c) The type of facility;
(d) The usual residence of the woman, including the city, county
and state;
(e) Her age;
(f) Her ethnic group or race;
(g) Her marital status;
(h) The number of previous live births;
(i) The number of previous induced abortions;
(j) The duration of her pregnancy, as measured from first day of
last normal menses to date of abortion, and as estimated by uterine
size prior to performance of the abortion;
(k) The type of abortion procedure; and
(l) If a woman has had a previously induced abortion, the
information in paragraphs (a) to (k), inclusive, or as much thereof as
can be reasonably obtained, for each previous abortion.
3. The Division may adopt regulations to permit studies of
individual cases of abortion, but these studies must not be permitted
unless:
-
*AB101*

– 3 –
(a) Absolute assurance is provided that confidentiality of
information on the persons involved will be preserved;
(b) Informed consent of each person involved in the study is
obtained in writing;
(c) The study is conducted according to established standards
and ethics; and
(d) The study is related to problems of health and has scientific
merit with regard to both design and the importance of the problems
to be solved.
4. The provisions of NRS 442.240 to 442.270, inclusive, and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, supersede and preempt
any ordinance or regulation adopted by the governing body of any
county, city, district, agency or other political subdivision of this
State that specifically regulates or disproportionately affects
abortions or facilities at which abortions are performed.
Sec. 2. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 3. As used in this section and sections 4 and 5 of this
act, unless the context otherwise requires, “health care facility”
means a facility licensed pursuant to chapter 449 of NRS, an
office of a provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other entity that provides health care.
Sec. 4. 1. A health care facility shall not make or
disseminate, or cause to be made or disseminated, to the public in
any newspaper or other publication, in any advertising device,
over the Internet or in any other manner a statement that the
health care facility knows or should know is deceptive concerning
any service that is or is not offered by the health care facility.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, a statement is deceptive if
the statement includes, without limitation, assertions to mislead
persons to believe that the health care facility provides a health
care service that the facility does not actually provide.
Sec. 5. 1. If the Attorney General has reason to believe that
a health care facility has violated the provisions of section 4 of this
act, the Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the
State of Nevada in any court of competent jurisdiction against that
health care facility to obtain a temporary restraining order, a
preliminary or permanent injunction or other appropriate relief.
The relief may include, without limitation, requiring the health
care facility to:
(a) Pay for and disseminate appropriate corrective advertising
in the same newspaper, publication or manner as was used to
disseminate the deceptive statement to the public;
(b) Post a remedial notice that corrects the effects of the
deceptive statement; or
-
*AB101*

– 4 –
(c) Provide such narrowly tailored relief as the court deems
necessary to remedy the adverse effects of the deceptive statement
on any patients seeking a service.
2. Before commencing an action pursuant to subsection 1,
the Attorney General shall provide a written notice to the relevant
health care facility, including, without limitation, the following
information:
(a) A statement that the Attorney General intends to
commence an action against the health care facility pursuant to
subsection 1;
(b) A description of the violation that the Attorney General
believes the health care facility has committed;
(c) The manner in which the health care facility must cure the
violation; and
(d) The time within which the health care facility must cure
the violation.
3. Before bringing an action pursuant to subsection 1 against
a health care facility, the Attorney General shall allow the health
care facility at least 10 days to cure the relevant violation.
4. If, in an action brought pursuant to subsection 1, a court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a health care facility
violated the provisions of section 4 of this act, the court:
(a) Shall award the State:
(1) A civil penalty of at least $50 and not more than $500
per violation; and
(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
(b) May award any other relief authorized by subsection 1.
5. This section does not limit the authority of this State or any
political subdivision of this State to seek any other administrative,
legal or equitable relief permitted by law.
Sec. 6. NRS 630.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.130 1. In addition to the other powers and duties
provided in this chapter, the Board shall, in the interest of the public,
judiciously:
(a) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Establish by regulation standards for licensure under this
chapter;
(c) Conduct examinations for licensure and establish a system of
scoring for those examinations;
(d) Investigate the character of each applicant for a license and
issue licenses to those applicants who meet the qualifications set by
this chapter and the Board; and
(e) Institute a proceeding in any court to enforce its orders or the
provisions of this chapter.
-
*AB101*

– 5 –
2. Upon determining that prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication to stop or reverse an abortion meets
generally accepted standards of the practice of medicine, the
Board may, in consultation with the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine, State Board of Nursing and State Board of Pharmacy,
adopt regulations authorizing a physician or physician assistant to
prescribe, dispense or administer medication to stop or reverse an
abortion. Any such regulations must specify:
(a) Each medication that a physician or physician assistant
may prescribe, dispense or administer to stop or reverse an
abortion; and
(b) The required procedures for prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication specified pursuant to paragraph (a) to
stop or reverse an abortion.
3. On or before February 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall submit to the Governor and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular
session of the Legislature a written report compiling:
(a) Disciplinary action taken by the Board during the previous
biennium against any licensee for malpractice or negligence;
(b) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.3067, 630.3068, subsections 3 and 6
of NRS 630.307 and NRS 690B.250; and
(c) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.30665, including, without limitation,
the number and types of surgeries performed by each holder of a
license to practice medicine and the occurrence of sentinel events
arising from such surgeries, if any.
 The report must include only aggregate information for statistical
purposes and exclude any identifying information related to a
particular person.
[3.] 4. The Board may adopt such regulations as are necessary
or desirable to enable it to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 7. NRS 630.306 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.306 1. The following acts, among others, constitute
grounds for initiating disciplinary action or denying licensure:
(a) Inability to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety
because of illness, a mental or physical condition or the use of
alcohol, drugs, narcotics or any other substance.
(b) Engaging in any conduct:
(1) Which is intended to deceive;
(2) Which the Board has determined is a violation of the
standards of practice established by regulation of the Board; or
(3) Which is in violation of a provision of chapter 639 of
NRS, or a regulation adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy
-
*AB101*

– 6 –
pursuant thereto, that is applicable to a licensee who is a
practitioner, as defined in NRS 639.0125.
(c) Administering, dispensing or prescribing any controlled
substance, or any dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS,
to or for himself or herself or to others except as authorized by law.
(d) Performing, assisting or advising the injection of any
substance containing liquid silicone into the human body, except for
the use of silicone oil to repair a retinal detachment.
(e) Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted
by law or performing services which the licensee knows or has
reason to know that he or she is not competent to perform or which
are beyond the scope of his or her training.
(f) Performing, without first obtaining the informed consent of
the patient or the patient’s family, any procedure or prescribing any
therapy which by the current standards of the practice of medicine is
experimental.
(g) Continual failure to exercise the skill or diligence or use the
methods ordinarily exercised under the same circumstances by
physicians in good standing practicing in the same specialty or field.
(h) Having an alcohol or other substance use disorder.
(i) Making or filing a report which the licensee or applicant
knows to be false or failing to file a record or report as required by
law or regulation.
(j) Failing to comply with the requirements of NRS 630.254.
(k) Failure by a licensee or applicant to report in writing, within
30 days, any disciplinary action taken against the licensee or
applicant by another state, the Federal Government or a foreign
country, including, without limitation, the revocation, suspension or
surrender of a license to practice medicine in another jurisdiction.
The provisions of this paragraph do not apply to any disciplinary
action taken by the Board or taken because of any disciplinary
action taken by the Board.
(l) Failure by a licensee or applicant to report in writing, within
30 days, any criminal action taken or conviction obtained against the
licensee or applicant, other than a minor traffic violation, in this
State or any other state or by the Federal Government, a branch of
the Armed Forces of the United States or any local or federal
jurisdiction of a foreign country.
(m) Failure to be found competent to practice medicine as a
result of an examination to determine medical competency pursuant
to NRS 630.318.
(n) Operation of a medical facility at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurs which results in the suspension
or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
-
*AB101*

– 7 –
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
(o) Failure to comply with the requirements of NRS 630.373.
(p) Engaging in any act that is unsafe or unprofessional conduct
in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
(q) Knowingly or willfully procuring or administering a
controlled substance or a dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454
of NRS that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, unless the unapproved controlled substance or
dangerous drug:
(1) Was procured through a retail pharmacy licensed
pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS;
(2) Was procured through a Canadian pharmacy which is
licensed pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS and which has been
recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(3) Is cannabis being used for medical purposes in
accordance with chapter 678C of NRS; or
(4) Is an individualized investigational treatment or
investigational drug or biological product prescribed to a patient
pursuant to NRS 630.3735 or 633.6945.
(r) Failure to supervise adequately a medical assistant pursuant
to the regulations of the Board.
(s) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 630.3745.
(t) Failure to obtain any training required by the Board pursuant
to NRS 630.2535.
(u) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 454.217 or
629.086.
(v) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 or
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(w) Performing or supervising the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(x) Except as authorized by regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 630.130, prescribing, dispensing or administering a
medication to stop or reverse an abortion.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Individualized investigational treatment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.690.
(b) “Investigational drug or biological product” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.351.
Sec. 8. NRS 632.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.120 1. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations establishing reasonable standards:
(1) For the denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of,
and the placement of conditions, limitations and restrictions upon, a
-
*AB101*

– 8 –
license to practice professional or practical nursing or a certificate to
practice as a nursing assistant or medication aide - certified.
(2) Of professional conduct for the practice of nursing.
(3) For prescribing and dispensing controlled substances and
dangerous drugs in accordance with applicable statutes.
(4) For the psychiatric training and experience necessary for
an advanced practice registered nurse to be authorized to make the
diagnoses, evaluations and examinations described in NRS
432B.6078, 432B.60816, 433A.162, 433A.240, 433A.335,
433A.390, 433A.430, 484C.300 and 484C.320 to 484C.350,
inclusive, the certifications described in NRS 432B.6075,
432B.60814, 433A.170, 433A.195 and 433A.200 and the sworn
statements or declarations described in NRS 433A.210 and
433A.335.
(b) Prepare and administer examinations for the issuance of a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(c) Investigate and determine the eligibility of an applicant for a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(d) Carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(e) Develop and disseminate annually to each registered nurse
who cares for children information concerning the signs and
symptoms of pediatric cancer.
2. Upon determining that prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication to stop or reverse an abortion meets
generally accepted standards of the practice of nursing, the Board
may, in consultation with the Board of Medical Examiners, State
Board of Osteopathic Medicine and State Board of Pharmacy,
adopt regulations authorizing an advanced practice registered
nurse to prescribe, dispense or administer medication to stop or
reverse an abortion and a registered nurse to administer
medication to stop or reverse an abortion. Any such regulations
must specify:
(a) Each medication that may be prescribed, dispensed or
administered to stop or reverse an abortion; and
(b) The required procedures for prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication specified pursuant to paragraph (a) to
stop or reverse an abortion.
3. The Board may adopt regulations establishing reasonable:
(a) Qualifications for the issuance of a license or certificate
under this chapter.
(b) Standards for the continuing professional competence of
licensees or holders of a certificate. The Board may evaluate
licensees or holders of a certificate periodically for compliance with
those standards.
-
*AB101*

– 9 –
[3.] 4. The Board may adopt regulations establishing a
schedule of reasonable fees and charges, in addition to those set
forth in NRS 632.345, for:
(a) Investigating licensees or holders of a certificate and
applicants for a license or certificate under this chapter;
(b) Evaluating the professional competence of licensees or
holders of a certificate;
(c) Conducting hearings pursuant to this chapter;
(d) Duplicating and verifying records of the Board; and
(e) Surveying, evaluating and approving schools of practical
nursing, and schools and courses of professional nursing,
 and collect the fees established pursuant to this subsection.
[4.] 5. For the purposes of this chapter, the Board shall, by
regulation, define the term “in the process of obtaining
accreditation.”
[5.] 6. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as may be necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter relating to nursing assistant
trainees, nursing assistants and medication aides - certified.
[6.] 7. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as are necessary to enable it to
administer the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 9. NRS 632.347 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.347 1. The Board may deny, revoke or suspend any
license or certificate applied for or issued pursuant to this chapter, or
take other disciplinary action against a licensee or holder of a
certificate, upon determining that the licensee or certificate holder:
(a) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to
procure a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Is guilty of any offense:
(1) Involving moral turpitude; or
(2) Related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a
licensee or holder of a certificate,
 in which case the record of conviction is conclusive evidence
thereof.
(c) Has been convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440,
inclusive.
(d) Is unfit or incompetent by reason of gross negligence or
recklessness in carrying out usual nursing functions.
(e) Uses any controlled substance, dangerous drug as defined in
chapter 454 of NRS, or intoxicating liquor to an extent or in a
manner which is dangerous or injurious to any other person or
which impairs his or her ability to conduct the practice authorized
by the license or certificate.
-
*AB101*

– 10 –
(f) Is a person with mental incompetence.
(g) Is guilty of unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is
not limited to, the following:
(1) Conviction of practicing medicine without a license in
violation of chapter 630 of NRS, in which case the record of
conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.
(2) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an
applicant in any examination required pursuant to this chapter for
the issuance of a license or certificate.
(3) Impersonating another licensed practitioner or holder of a
certificate.
(4) Permitting or allowing another person to use his or her
license or certificate to practice as a licensed practical nurse,
registered nurse, nursing assistant or medication aide - certified.
(5) Repeated malpractice, which may be evidenced by claims
of malpractice settled against the licensee or certificate holder.
(6) Physical, verbal or psychological abuse of a patient.
(7) Conviction for the use or unlawful possession of a
controlled substance or dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of
NRS.
(h) Has willfully or repeatedly violated the provisions of this
chapter. The voluntary surrender of a license or certificate issued
pursuant to this chapter is prima facie evidence that the licensee or
certificate holder has committed or expects to commit a violation of
this chapter.
(i) Is guilty of aiding or abetting any person in a violation of this
chapter.
(j) Has falsified an entry on a patient’s medical chart concerning
a controlled substance.
(k) Has falsified information which was given to a physician,
pharmacist, podiatric physician or dentist to obtain a controlled
substance.
(l) Has knowingly procured or administered a controlled
substance or a dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS that
is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
unless the unapproved controlled substance or dangerous drug:
(1) Was procured through a retail pharmacy licensed
pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS;
(2) Was procured through a Canadian pharmacy which is
licensed pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS and which has been
recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(3) Is cannabis being used for medical purposes in
accordance with chapter 678C of NRS; or
-
*AB101*

– 11 –
(4) Is an individualized investigational treatment or
investigational drug or biological product prescribed to a patient
pursuant to NRS 630.3735 or 633.6945.
(m) Has been disciplined in another state in connection with a
license to practice nursing or a certificate to practice as a nursing
assistant or medication aide - certified, or has committed an act in
another state which would constitute a violation of this chapter.
(n) Has engaged in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or
endanger a patient or the general public.
(o) Has willfully failed to comply with a regulation, subpoena or
order of the Board.
(p) Has operated a medical facility at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility was suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurred which resulted in the
suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
(q) Is an advanced practice registered nurse who has failed to
obtain any training required by the Board pursuant to
NRS 632.2375.
(r) Is an advanced practice registered nurse who has failed to
comply with the provisions of NRS 453.163, 453.164, 453.226,
639.23507, 639.23535 and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and
any regulations adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant
thereto.
(s) Has engaged in the fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or
otherwise inappropriate prescribing, administering or dispensing of
a controlled substance listed in schedule II, III or IV.
(t) Has violated the provisions of NRS 454.217 or 629.086.
(u) Has performed or supervised the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(v) Has failed to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315
or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(w) Except as authorized by any regulations adopted pursuant
to NRS 632.120, has prescribed, dispensed or administered a
medication to stop or reverse an abortion.
2. For the purposes of this section, a plea or verdict of guilty or
guilty but mentally ill or a plea of nolo contendere constitutes a
conviction of an offense. The Board may take disciplinary action
pending the appeal of a conviction.
3. A licensee or certificate holder is not subject to disciplinary
action solely for administering auto-injectable epinephrine pursuant
to a valid order issued pursuant to NRS 630.374 or 633.707.
4. As used in this section:
-
*AB101*

– 12 –
(a) “Individualized investigational treatment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.690.
(b) “Investigational drug or biological product” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.351.
Sec. 10. NRS 633.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.291 1. The Board shall adopt and enforce regulations
necessary to enable it to carry out its duties under this chapter,
including but not limited to regulations which establish the
principles of medical ethics to be used as the basis for determining
whether conduct which does not constitute malpractice is unethical.
2. Upon determining that prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication to stop or reverse an abortion meets
generally accepted standards of the practice of medicine, the
Board may, in consultation with the Board of Medical Examiners,
State Board of Nursing and State Board of Pharmacy, adopt
regulations authorizing an osteopathic physician or physician
assistant to prescribe, dispense or administer medication to stop or
reverse an abortion. Any such regulations must specify:
(a) Each medication that an osteopathic physician or
physician assistant may prescribe, dispense or administer to stop
or reverse an abortion; and
(b) The required procedures for prescribing, dispensing or
administering a medication specified pursuant to paragraph (a) to
stop or reverse an abortion.
Sec. 11. NRS 633.511 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.511 1. The grounds for initiating disciplinary action
pursuant to this chapter are:
(a) Unprofessional conduct.
(b) Conviction of:
(1) A violation of any federal or state law regulating the
possession, distribution or use of any controlled substance or any
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS;
(2) A felony relating to the practice of osteopathic medicine
or practice as a physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant;
(3) A violation of any of the provisions of NRS 616D.200,
616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440, inclusive;
(4) Murder, voluntary manslaughter or mayhem;
(5) Any felony involving the use of a firearm or other deadly
weapon;
(6) Assault with intent to kill or to commit sexual assault or
mayhem;
(7) Sexual assault, statutory sexual seduction, incest,
lewdness, indecent exposure or any other sexually related crime;
(8) Abuse or neglect of a child or contributory delinquency;
or
-
*AB101*

– 13 –
(9) Any offense involving moral turpitude.
(c) The suspension of a license to practice osteopathic medicine
or to practice as a physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant by
any other jurisdiction.
(d) Malpractice or gross malpractice, which may be evidenced
by a claim of malpractice settled against a licensee.
(e) Professional incompetence.
(f) Failure to comply with the requirements of NRS 633.527.
(g) Failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 3 of
NRS 633.471.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 633.694.
(i) Operation of a medical facility, as defined in NRS 449.0151,
at any time during which:
(1) The license of the facility is suspended or revoked; or
(2) An act or omission occurs which results in the suspension
or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This paragraph applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
(j) Failure to comply with the provisions of subsection 2 of
NRS 633.322.
(k) Signing a blank prescription form.
(l) Knowingly or willfully procuring or administering a
controlled substance or a dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454
of NRS that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, unless the unapproved controlled substance or
dangerous drug:
(1) Was procured through a retail pharmacy licensed
pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS;
(2) Was procured through a Canadian pharmacy which is
licensed pursuant to chapter 639 of NRS and which has been
recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(3) Is cannabis being used for medical purposes in
accordance with chapter 678C of NRS; or
(4) Is an individualized investigational treatment or
investigational drug or biological product prescribed to a patient
pursuant to NRS 630.3735 or 633.6945.
(m) Attempting, directly or indirectly, by intimidation, coercion
or deception, to obtain or retain a patient or to discourage the use of
a second opinion.
(n) Terminating the medical care of a patient without adequate
notice or without making other arrangements for the continued care
of the patient.
(o) In addition to the provisions of subsection 3 of NRS
633.524, making or filing a report which the licensee knows to be
-
*AB101*

– 14 –
false, failing to file a record or report that is required by law or
knowingly or willfully obstructing or inducing another to obstruct
the making or filing of such a record or report.
(p) Failure to report any person the licensee knows, or has
reason to know, is in violation of the provisions of this chapter,
except for a violation of NRS 633.4717, or the regulations of the
Board within 30 days after the date the licensee knows or has reason
to know of the violation.
(q) Failure by a licensee or applicant to report in writing, within
30 days, any criminal action taken or conviction obtained against the
licensee or applicant, other than a minor traffic violation, in this
State or any other state or by the Federal Government, a branch of
the Armed Forces of the United States or any local or federal
jurisdiction of a foreign country.
(r) Engaging in any act that is unsafe in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Board.
(s) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 629.515.
(t) Failure to supervise adequately a medical assistant pursuant
to the regulations of the Board.
(u) Failure to obtain any training required by the Board pursuant
to NRS 633.473.
(v) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 633.6955.
(w) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 453.163,
453.164, 453.226, 639.23507, 639.23535 and 639.2391 to
639.23916, inclusive, and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto.
(x) Fraudulent, illegal, unauthorized or otherwise inappropriate
prescribing, administering or dispensing of a controlled substance
listed in schedule II, III or IV.
(y) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 454.217 or
629.086.
(z) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 or
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(aa) Performing or supervising the performance of a pelvic
examination in violation of NRS 629.085.
(bb) Except as authorized by any regulations adopted pursuant
to NRS 633.291, prescribing, dispensing or administering a
medication to stop or reverse an abortion.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Individualized investigational treatment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.690.
(b) “Investigational drug or biological product” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 454.351.
Sec. 12. NRS 639.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.070 1. The Board may:
-
*AB101*

– 15 –
(a) Adopt such regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this
State, as are necessary for the protection of the public, appertaining
to the practice of pharmacy and the lawful performance of its duties.
(b) Adopt regulations requiring that prices charged by retail
pharmacies for drugs and medicines which are obtained by
prescription be posted in the pharmacies and be given on the
telephone to persons requesting such information.
(c) Adopt regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of this
State, authorizing the Executive Secretary of the Board to issue
certificates, licenses and permits required by this chapter and
chapters 453 and 454 of NRS.
(d) Adopt regulations governing the dispensing of poisons,
drugs, chemicals and medicines.
(e) Regulate the practice of pharmacy.
(f) Regulate the sale and dispensing of poisons, drugs, chemicals
and medicines.
(g) Regulate the means of recordkeeping and storage, handling,
sanitation and security of drugs, poisons, medicines, chemicals and
devices, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to:
(1) Pharmacies, institutional pharmacies and pharmacies in
correctional institutions;
(2) Drugs stored in hospitals; and
(3) Drugs stored for the purpose of wholesale distribution.
(h) Examine and register, upon application, pharmacists and
other persons who dispense or distribute medications whom it
deems qualified.
(i) Charge and collect necessary and reasonable fees for the
expedited processing of a request or for any other incidental service
the Board provides, other than those specifically set forth in this
chapter.
(j) Maintain offices in as many localities in the State as it finds
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(k) Employ attorneys, inspectors, investigators and other
professional consultants and clerical personnel necessary to the
discharge of its duties.
(l) Enforce the provisions of NRS 453.011 to 453.552, inclusive,
and enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 454 of NRS.
(m) Adopt regulations concerning the information required to be
submitted in connection with an application for any license,
certificate or permit required by this chapter or chapter 453 or 454
of NRS.
(n) Adopt regulations concerning the education, experience and
background of a person who is employed by the holder of a license
or permit issued pursuant to this chapter and who has access to
drugs and devices.
-
*AB101*

– 16 –
(o) Adopt regulations concerning the use of computerized
mechanical equipment for the filling of prescriptions.
(p) Participate in and expend money for programs that enhance
the practice of pharmacy.
(q) Enter into written agreements with local, state and federal
agencies for the purpose of improving the enforcement of and
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and chapters 453 and
454 of NRS.
(r) Contract with a private entity to administer the database of
the program established pursuant to NRS 453.162.
2. Upon determining that dispensing a medication to stop or
reverse an abortion meets generally accepted standards of the
practice of pharmacy, the Board may, in consultation with the
Board of Medical Examiners, State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine and State Board of Nursing, adopt regulations
authorizing a pharmacist to dispense medication to stop or reverse
an abortion. Any such regulations must specify:
(a) Each medication that a pharmacist may dispense to stop or
reverse an abortion; and
(b) The required procedures for dispensing a medication
specified pursuant to paragraph (a) to stop or reverse an abortion.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any documents or other information to
any other licensing board or any other agency that is investigating a
person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement agency.
[3.] 4. This section does not authorize the Board to prohibit
open-market competition in the advertising and sale of prescription
drugs and pharmaceutical services.
Sec. 13. NRS 639.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.210 The Board may suspend or revoke any certificate,
license, registration or permit issued pursuant to this chapter, and
deny the application of any person for a certificate, license,
registration or permit, if the holder or applicant:
1. Is not of good moral character;
2. Is guilty of habitual intemperance;
3. Becomes or is intoxicated or under the influence of liquor,
any depressant drug or a controlled substance, unless taken pursuant
to a lawfully issued prescription, while on duty in any establishment
licensed by the Board;
4. Is guilty of unprofessional conduct or conduct contrary to
the public interest;
5. Has a substance use disorder;
6. Has been convicted of a violation of any law or regulation of
the Federal Government or of this or any other state related to
-
*AB101*

– 17 –
controlled substances, dangerous drugs, drug samples, or the
wholesale or retail distribution of drugs;
7. Has been convicted of:
(a) A felony relating to holding a certificate, license, registration
or permit pursuant to this chapter;
(b) A felony pursuant to NRS 639.550 or 639.555; or
(c) Other crime involving moral turpitude, dishonesty or
corruption;
8. Has been convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 616D.200, 616D.220, 616D.240 or 616D.300 to 616D.440,
inclusive;
9. Has willfully made to the Board or its authorized
representative any false statement which is material to the
administration or enforcement of any of the provisions of this
chapter;
10. Has obtained any certificate, certification, license or permit
by the filing of an application, or any record, affidavit or other
information in support thereof, which is false or fraudulent;
11. Has violated any provision of the Federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act or any other federal law or regulation relating to
prescription drugs;
12. Has violated, attempted to violate, assisted or abetted in the
violation of or conspired to violate any of the provisions of this
chapter or any law or regulation relating to drugs, the manufacture
or distribution of drugs or the practice of pharmacy, or has
knowingly permitted, allowed, condoned or failed to report a
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any law or
regulation relating to drugs, the manufacture or distribution of drugs
or the practice of pharmacy committed by the holder of a certificate,
license, registration or permit;
13. Has failed to renew a certificate, license or permit by
failing to submit the application for renewal or pay the renewal fee
therefor;
14. Has had a certificate, license or permit suspended or
revoked in another state on grounds which would cause suspension
or revocation of a certificate, license or permit in this State;
15. Has, as a managing pharmacist, violated any provision of
law or regulation concerning recordkeeping or inventory in a store
over which he or she presides, or has knowingly allowed a violation
of any provision of this chapter or other state or federal laws or
regulations relating to the practice of pharmacy by personnel of the
pharmacy under his or her supervision;
16. Has repeatedly been negligent, which may be evidenced by
claims of malpractice settled against him or her;
-
*AB101*

– 18 –
17. Has failed to maintain and make available to a state or
federal officer any records in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter or chapter 453 or 454 of NRS;
18. Has failed to file or maintain a bond or other security if
required by NRS 639.515;
19. Has dispensed a self-administered hormonal contraceptive
under the protocol established pursuant to NRS 639.28077 without
complying with NRS 639.28078; [or]
20. Except as authorized by any regulations adopted pursuant
to NRS 639.070, has dispensed a medication to stop or reverse an
abortion; or
21. Has operated a medical facility, as defined in NRS
449.0151, at any time during which:
(a) The license of the facility was suspended or revoked; or
(b) An act or omission occurred which resulted in the
suspension or revocation of the license pursuant to NRS 449.160.
 This subsection applies to an owner or other principal responsible
for the operation of the facility.
Sec. 14. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*AB101*